Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-193
Board of Parole; no jurisdiction over person neglected, dependent, delinquent, or in need of special supervision.

The Board of Parole shall not have jurisdiction over persons who are committed to the Department of Correctional Services after being found neglected, dependent, delinquent or in need of special supervision in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 43, article 2.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 24, p. 3086.